Colorado, session 2026A, HB1158.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the judicial department for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025,
section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part IX as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART IX
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
(1) SUPREME COURT AND COURT OF APPEALS52
Appellate Court Programs53 19,290,927 19,218,927 72,000a
(145.3 FTE)
Office of Attorney Regulation
Counsel 16,049,404 16,049,404(I)b
(80.9 FTE)
Law Library 1,177,060 853,222 250,941(I)c 72,897d
(6.0 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 245,565 245,565(I)b
36,762,956
a This amount shall be from various fees and cost recoveries.
b These amounts shall be from annual attorney registration fees and law examination application fees established by the Colorado Supreme Court pursuant to the Colorado Rules of Civil
Procedure, Chapter 18, Rules 203.1, 203.4 (4), and 227. These amounts are included for informational purposes only as these fees are continuously appropriated under the Judicial
Department's constitutional authority.
c This amount shall be from appellate court filing fees and other fees credited to the Supreme Court Library Fund created in Section 13-2-120, C.R.S. This amount is included for
informational purposes only as these fees are continuously appropriated under the Judicial Department's constitutional authority.
d This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Law from the Personal Services line item appropriation within the Legal Services to State Agencies section.
(2) STATE COURTS ADMINISTRATION52
(A) Administration and Technology
General Courts
Administration 42,921,123 31,455,722 8,898,632a 2,566,769b
(314.5 FTE) (38.0 FTE) (6.0 FTE)
Information Technology
Infrastructure 24,090,779 931,200 23,159,579c
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
STATE INTERNET PORTAL
AUTHORITY IT GRANT 1,000,000 1,000,000e
Information Technology Cost
Recoveries 4,535,800 4,535,800c
Indirect Cost Assessment 854,035 854,035d
72,401,737
73,401,737
a Of this amount, $8,170,352 shall be from the Judicial Department Information Technology Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-114 (1), C.R.S., $192,927 shall be from the Correctional
Treatment Cash Fund created in Section 18-19-103 (4)(a), C.R.S., $70,000 shall be from the Justice Center Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (7)(a), C.R.S., $28,491 shall be from
the Court Security Cash Fund created in Section 13-1-204 (1)(a), C.R.S., $28,491 shall be from the Family Violence Justice Fund created in Section 14-4-107 (1), C.R.S., $28,491 shall
be from the Eviction Legal Defense Fund created in Section 13-40-127 (2), C.R.S., $28,491 shall be from the Underfunded Courthouse Facility Cash Fund created in Section 13-1-304
(1), C.R.S., and $351,389 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of this amount, $2,171,420 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., $185,970 shall
be from indirect cost recoveries related to federal grants to cover both departmental and statewide indirect costs, $133,665 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries collected by
the Judicial Department or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $75,714 shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services
Child Support Enforcement.
c These amounts shall be from the Judicial Department Information Technology Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-114 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
e THIS AMOUNT SHALL BE FROM GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS.
(B) Central Appropriations
Health, Life, and Dental 59,217,938 53,217,156 6,000,782a
61,048,435 54,904,874 6,143,561a
Short-term Disability 254,768 229,145 25,623a
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 1,637,796 1,473,077 164,719a
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 36,395,487 32,735,064 3,660,423a
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Salary Survey 10,174,448 9,141,283 1,033,165a
Step Pay 1,791,174 1,564,007 227,167a
PERA Direct Distribution 6,925,531 6,116,253 809,278a
Workers' Compensation 665,368 665,368
Legal Services 175,691 175,691
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 1,616,684 1,616,684
Vehicle Lease Payments 164,327 164,327
176,926 176,926
Capital Outlay 220,036 206,366 13,670b
Ralph L. Carr Colorado
Judicial Center Leased Space 4,943,740 4,943,740
Payments to OIT 3,910,702 3,910,702
3,498,013 3,498,013
CORE Operations 122,071 122,071
Digital Trunk Radio Payments 31,542 31,542
128,247,303
129,677,710
a These amounts shall be from various sources of cash funds including: the Alcohol and Drug Driving Safety Program Fund created in Section 42-4-1301.3 (4)(a), C.R.S.; the Correctional
Treatment Cash Fund created in Section 18-19-103 (4)(a), C.R.S.; the Court Security Cash Fund created in Section 13-1-204 (1)(a), C.R.S.; the Family-friendly Court Program Cash
Fund created in Section 13-3-113 (6)(a), C.R.S.; the Judicial Collection Enhancement Fund created in Section 16-11-101.6 (2), C.R.S.; the Judicial Department Information Technology
Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-114 (1), C.R.S.; the Judicial Stabilization Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (6), C.R.S.; the Offender Services Fund created in Section
16-11-214 (1)(a), C.R.S.; the Restorative Justice Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-25-101 (3)(a), C.R.S.; the State Commission on Judicial Performance Cash Fund created in Section
13-5.5-115, C.R.S.; AND the Underfunded Courthouse Facility Cash Fund created in Section 13-1-304 (1), C.R.S.; and the Office of Public Guardianship Cash Fund created in Section
13-94-108 (1), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $7,000 shall be from the Judicial Stabilization Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (6), C.R.S., and $6,670 shall be from the Offender Services Fund created in
Section 16-11-214 (1)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(C) Centrally-administered Programs
Victim Assistance 16,375,000 16,375,000(I)a
Victim Compensation 13,400,000 13,400,000(I)b
Collections Program and
Office of Restitution Services 8,987,526 8,089,985c 897,541d
(104.2 FTE) (19.0 FTE)
Problem-solving Courts 4,813,264 500,508 4,312,756e
(2.7 FTE) (38.2 FTE)
Language Interpreters and
Translators 10,816,834 10,682,380 134,454f
(41.9 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
Judicial Security Office 408,839 408,839
448,942 40,103e
(3.0 FTE)
(0.3 FTE)
Courthouse Security 3,033,591 500,000 2,533,591g
Appropriation to the
Underfunded Courthouse
Facility Cash Fund 1,000,000 1,000,000
Underfunded Courthouse
Facilities Grant Program 3,000,000 2,000,000h 1,000,000i
COURTHOUSE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY
INFRASTRUCTURE53a 613,300 613,300
Senior Judge Program 2,290,895 2,290,895e
Judicial Education and
Training 1,303,686 1,303,686e
(4.0 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Office of Judicial
Performance Evaluation 798,083 798,083j
(3.0 FTE)
Family Violence Justice
Grants 2,170,000 2,000,000 170,000k
Restorative Justice Programs 1,020,879 1,020,879l
(1.0 FTE)
District Attorney Adult
Pretrial Diversion Programs 675,000 100,000 406,000m 169,000n
Family-friendly Court
Program 270,000 270,000o
Appropriation to the Eviction
Legal Defense Fund 1,100,000 1,100,000
Eviction Legal Defense Grant
Program 1,500,000 400,000p 1,100,000q
Appropriation to the
Colorado Access to
Justice Cash Fund 100,000 100,000
Professional Licenses 225,000 225,000
73,288,597
73,942,000
a This amount shall be from the Victims and Witnesses Assistance and Law Enforcement Fund established in the office of the court administrator of each judicial district pursuant to
Section 24-4.2-103 (1), C.R.S. This amount is included for informational purposes only as each judicial district court administrator and district attorney are authorized to spend this money
for statutorily authorized purposes without an appropriation.
b This amount shall be from the Crime Victim Compensation Fund established in the office of the court administrator of each judicial district pursuant to Section 24-4.1-117 (1), C.R.S.
This amount is included for informational purposes only as each judicial district court administrator and district attorney are authorized to spend this money for statutorily authorized
purposes without an appropriation.
c This amount shall be from the Judicial Collection Enhancement Fund created in Section 16-11-101.6 (2), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be transferred from the Victim Assistance line item appropriation within this subsection.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
e These amounts shall be from the Judicial Stabilization Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (6), C.R.S.
f Of this amount, $84,454 shall be from the Judicial Stabilization Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101(6),C.R.S., and $50,000 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
g This amount shall be from the Court Security Cash Fund created in Section 13-1-204 (1)(a), C.R.S.
h This amount shall be from the fund balance reserve in the Underfunded Courthouse Facility Cash Fund created in Section 13-1-304 (1), C.R.S.
i This amount shall be from revenue originating as General Fund deposited into the Underfunded Courthouse Facility Cash Fund created in Section 13-1-304 (1), C.R.S.
j This amount shall be from the State Commission on Judicial Performance Cash Fund created in Section 13-5.5-115, C.R.S.
k This amount shall be from the Family Violence Justice Fund created in Section 14-4-107 (1), C.R.S.
l This amount shall be from the Restorative Justice Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-25-101 (3)(a), C.R.S.
m This amount shall be from grants.
n This amount shall be from the Correctional Treatment Cash Fund created in Section 18-19-103 (4)(a), C.R.S.
o This amount shall be from the Family-friendly Court Program Cash Fund created in Section 13-3-113 (6)(a), C.R.S.
p This amount shall be from the fund balance reserve in the Eviction Legal Defense Fund created in Section 13-40-127 (2), C.R.S.
q These amounts shall be from revenue originating as General Fund deposited into the Eviction Legal Defense Fund created in Section 13-40-127 (2), C.R.S.
(D) Ralph L. Carr Colorado Judicial Center
Building Management and
Operations 7,595,049 638,385a 6,956,664b
(14.0 FTE)
Appropriation to Justice
Center Maintenance Fund 4,433,206 4,433,206a
Justice Center Maintenance
Fund Expenditures 4,433,206 4,433,206c
Debt Service Payments 15,754,016 4,765,847 7,754,016d 3,234,153b
32,215,477
a These amounts shall be from the fund balance reserve in the Justice Center Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (7)(a), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from revenue collected from state agencies for Ralph L. Carr Colorado Judicial Center Leased Space and deposited in the Justice Center Cash Fund created
in Section 13-32-101 (7)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Justice Center Maintenance Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (7)(d)(I), C.R.S.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
d This amount shall be from the fund balance reserve in the Justice Center Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (7)(a), C.R.S. Debt service payments include an estimated $5,354,093
in federal revenues made available through the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act that is not included in this appropriation. These funds cover a portion of the interest
costs associated with the project financing that was secured through taxable "Build America" certificates of participation.
306,153,114
309,236,924
(3) TRIAL COURTS52
Trial Court Programs53, 54, 54a 215,964,909 179,804,257 34,851,312a 1,309,340b
(1,682.0 FTE) (355.0 FTE)
Court Costs, Jury Costs,
Court-appointed Counsel, and
Reimbursements for Vacated
Convictions 10,879,818 10,714,569 165,249c
District Attorney Mandated
Costs 2,488,742 2,280,742 208,000c
ACTION and Statewide
Discovery Sharing Systems 3,490,000 3,420,000 70,000d
Federal Funds and Other
Grants 3,296,574 1,371,574c 300,000e 1,625,000(I)
(3.0 FTE) (6.0 FTE) (4.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 513,038 513,038f
236,633,081
a Of this amount, an estimated $32,634,872 shall be from the Judicial Stabilization Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (6), C.R.S., $1,107,724 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash
Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $1,108,716 shall be from various fees and cost recoveries.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services Child Support Enforcement.
c These amounts shall be from various fees, cost recoveries, and grants.
d This amount shall be from the Statewide Discovery Sharing Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-26-102 (2)(a), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be transferred from other state agencies.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
f This amount shall be from the Judicial Stabilization Cash Fund created in Section 13-32-101 (6), C.R.S.
(4) PROBATION AND RELATED SERVICES52
Probation Programs 123,530,668 113,647,034 9,883,634a
(1,165.8 FTE) (123.7 FTE)
Offender Treatment and
Services55 22,468,054 276,201 17,253,853b 4,938,000c
22,391,853 17,453,853b
Appropriation to the
Correctional Treatment Cash
Fund 17,702,906 16,075,939 1,626,967d
S.B. 91-094 Juvenile Services 1,596,837 1,596,837e
(15.0 FTE)
Correctional Treatment Cash
Fund Expenditures56 26,389,629 26,389,629f
26,996,834 26,996,834f
(1.0 FTE)
Reimbursements to Law
Enforcement Agencies for the
Costs of Returning a
Probationer 287,500 287,500g
Victims Grants 650,000 650,000h
(6.0 FTE)
Federal Funds and Other
Grants 5,615,040 1,965,040i 850,000j 2,800,000(I)
(2.0 FTE) (18.0 FTE) (12.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 537,263 537,263k
198,777,897
199,308,901
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, an estimated $6,094,582 shall be from the Offender Services Fund created in Section 16-11-214 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $3,597,060 shall be from the Alcohol and
Drug Driving Safety Program Fund created in Section 42-4-1301.3 (4)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $191,992 shall be from various fees and cost recoveries.
b Of this amount, an estimated $15,509,883 shall be from the Offender Services Fund created in Section 16-11-214 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $730,926 shall be from the Correctional
Treatment Cash Fund created in Section 18-19-103 (4)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $603,044 shall be from the Sex Offender Surcharge Fund created in Section 18-21-103 (3), C.R.S., and
an estimated $410,000 $610,000 shall be from various fees and cost recoveries.
c Of this amount, $3,831,000 shall be from the Correctional Treatment Cash Fund created in Section 18-19-103 (4)(a), C.R.S., and $1,107,000 shall be transferred from the Department
of Human Services from the Behavioral Health Administration, Substance Use Treatment and Prevention Services, Community Prevention and Treatment Programs line item
appropriation.
d This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services from the S.B. 91-094 Programs line item appropriation.
f This amount shall be from the Correctional Treatment Cash Fund created in Section 18-19-103 (4)(a), C.R.S.
g This amount shall be from the Interstate Compact Probation Transfer Cash Fund created in Section 18-1.3-204 (4)(b)(II)(A), C.R.S.
h Of this amount, an estimated $425,000 shall be transferred from local Victims and Witnesses Assistance and Law Enforcement Board grants reflected in the Victim Assistance line
item appropriation within the Courts Administration, Centrally Administered Programs subsection of this department, pursuant to Section 24-4.2-105 (2.5)(a)(II), C.R.S., and an estimated
$225,000 shall be transferred from the Department of Public Safety from the State Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Program line item appropriation within the Division of
Criminal Justice, pursuant to Section 24-33.5-506 (1)(b), C.R.S.
i This amount shall be from various fees, cost recoveries, and grants.
j This amount shall be transferred from other state agencies.
k This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(5) OFFICE OF STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER57
Personal Services53 129,975,546 129,975,546
(1,205.3 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 14,928,128 14,928,128
15,509,393 15,509,393
Short-term Disability 82,179 82,179
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 528,291 528,291
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 11,739,792 11,739,792
Salary Survey 3,171,676 3,171,676
Step Pay 1,567,492 1,567,492
PERA Direct Distribution 2,114,596 2,114,596
Workers' Compensation 187,621 187,621
Operating Expenses 2,273,678 2,273,678
Legal Services 53,100 53,100
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 455,873 455,873
Vehicle Lease Payments 137,306 137,306
105,848 105,848
Ralph L. Carr Colorado
Judicial Center Leased Space 974,374 974,374
Leased Space and Utilities 10,882,882 10,882,882
Automation Plan 3,822,295 3,822,295
Data Storage 2,506,767 2,506,767
Payments to OIT 1,124,861 1,124,861
1,006,157 1,006,157
CORE Operations 9,981 9,981
Attorney Registration 166,134 166,134
158,894 158,894
Contract Services 49,395 49,395
Mandated Costs 4,604,036 4,604,036
Training 466,000 436,000 30,000a
473,240 443,240
Grants 713,364 713,364b
(6.8 FTE)
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Cases Impacted by CBI DNA
Test Misconduct 300,000 300,000
543,328 543,328
192,835,367
193,509,798
a This amount shall be from training fees.
b This amount shall be from grants.
(6) OFFICE OF ALTERNATE DEFENSE COUNSEL58
Personal Services53 4,975,643 4,975,643
(41.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 580,208 580,208
596,836 596,836
Short-term Disability 7,056 7,056
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 20,922 20,922
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 470,456 470,456
Salary Survey 128,988 128,988
Step Pay 32,089 32,089
Operating Expenses 408,087 408,087
Legal Services 65,208 65,208
Training and Conferences 180,000 100,000 80,000a
Conflict-of-interest Contracts 59,345,962 59,345,962
70,948,141 70,948,141
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Mandated Costs 3,049,773 3,049,773
3,365,028 3,365,028
69,264,392
81,198,454
a This amount shall be from training fees.
(7) OFFICE OF THE CHILD'S REPRESENTATIVE59
Personal Services53 4,913,369 4,338,846 574,523a
(39.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 473,589 435,045 38,544a
486,603 448,059
Short-term Disability 6,169 5,425 744a
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 18,507 16,276 2,231a
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 411,271 361,679 49,592a
Salary Survey 112,180 100,049 12,131a
Step Pay 27,909 24,891 3,018a
Operating Expenses60 1,897,330 314,150 1,583,180a
Leased Space 159,575 159,575
CASA Contracts 2,750,000 2,750,000
Training 158,000 58,000 100,000a
Court-appointed Counsel 33,273,214 31,456,122 1,817,092a
Mandated Costs 81,000 81,000
Grants 56,909 56,909b
44,339,022
44,352,036
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a These amounts shall be from transfers from the Department of Human Services' Division of Child Welfare from federal Title IV-E reimbursements deposited in the Title IV-E
Administrative Cost Cash Fund created in Section 26-2-102.5 (3)(b)(I), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds including transfers from the Department of Human Services' Division of Child Welfare and from the Judicial
Department.
(8) OFFICE OF THE RESPONDENT PARENTS' COUNSEL61
Personal Services53 2,963,145 1,520,393 1,442,752a
(18.9 FTE) (1.1 FTE)
(10.0 FTE) (10.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 389,024 368,247 20,777a
397,699 376,922
Short-term Disability 4,039 2,064 1,975a
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 12,119 6,195 5,924a
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 269,310 137,645 131,665a
Salary Survey 73,816 37,727 36,089a
Step Pay 18,365 9,387 8,978a
Operating Expenses 386,429 155,479 230,950a
548,299 267,349 280,950a
Legal Services 32,957 32,957
Parent Advocates 1,469,153 1,469,153a
Preventative Legal Services 50,704 50,704a
Training 138,000 30,000 6,000b 102,000a
Court-appointed Counsel 28,884,159 28,884,159
27,684,159 27,684,159
Mandated Costs 1,114,592 1,114,592
1,414,592 1,414,592
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Grants 31,095 31,095c
35,836,907
35,107,452
a These amounts shall be from transfers from the Department of Human Services' Division of Child Welfare from federal Title IV-E reimbursements deposited in the Title IV-E
Administrative Cost Cash Fund created in Section 26-2-102.5 (3)(b)(I), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from training fees.
c This amount shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds including transfers from the Department of Human Services' Division of Child Welfare.
(9) OFFICE OF THE CHILD PROTECTION OMBUDSMAN
Program Costs 2,565,680 2,565,680
2,503,572 2,503,572
(15.0 FTE)
Legal Services 37,525 37,525
2,603,205
2,541,097
(10) INDEPENDENT ETHICS COMMISSION
Program Costs 314,589 314,589
(1.5 FTE)
Legal Services 104,165 104,165
418,754
(11) OFFICE OF PUBLIC GUARDIANSHIP
Program Costs 2,893,191 663,888 1,997,141a 232,162b
2,896,806 667,503
(0.9 FTE) (14.0 FTE) (2.0 FTE)
Legal Services 308,551 308,551
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Indirect Cost Assessment 23,154 23,154a
3,224,896
3,228,511
a These amounts shall be from the Office of Public Guardianship Cash Fund created in Section 13-94-108 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services from the Behavioral Health Administration, Integrated Behavioral Health Services, Community
Transition Services line item appropriation.
(12) COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL DISCIPLINE
Office of Judicial Discipline 1,381,114 1,381,114
1,383,283 1,383,283
(5.0 FTE)
Legal Services 24,740 24,740
1,405,854
1,408,023
(13) OFFICE OF BRIDGES OF COLORADO62
Personal Services 11,769,934 11,769,934
(116.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 1,558,454 1,558,454
1,043,123 1,043,123
Short-term Disability 5,928 5,928
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 38,111 38,111
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 846,920 846,920
Salary Survey 232,135 232,135
Step Pay 57,753 57,753
Operating Expenses 1,338,403 1,338,403
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Legal Services 117,074 117,074
Psychological Assessment
Services 613,407 613,407
(7.0 FTE)
Participant Services 821,863 821,863
17,399,982
16,884,651
(14) OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES FOR INDEPENDENT AGENCIES
ASIA Office63 888,064 888,064
(6.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 125,019 125,019
93,264 93,264
Short-term Disability 434 434
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 2,793 2,793
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 62,060 62,060
Salary Survey 17,010 17,010
Step Pay 4,232 4,232
Workers' Compensation 39,965 39,965
Legal Services 25,378 25,378
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 97,107 97,107
Ralph L. Carr Colorado
Judicial Center Leased Space 511,522 511,522
Payments to OIT 245,370 245,370
219,477 219,477
CORE Operations 236,436 236,436
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Competency and Behavioral
Health Data Hub 100,000 100,000
2,355,390
2,297,742
TOTALS PART IX
(JUDICIAL) $1,148,010,817 $875,204,785 $203,914,808a $64,466,224 $4,425,000b
$1,162,888,380 $888,042,261 $205,297,690a $65,123,429
a Of this amount, $46,320,910 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
52 Judicial Department, Supreme Court and Court of Appeals; State Courts Administration; Trial Courts; Probation and Related Services -- In addition to the
transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108 (5), C.R.S., up to 10.0 percent of the total appropriation to the following divisions may be transferred between
line items: Supreme Court and Court of Appeals, Courts Administration, Trial Courts, Probation and Related Services. Appropriations may be transferred
within these divisions and between these divisions.
53 Judicial Department, Supreme Court and Court of Appeals, Appellate Court Programs; Trial Courts, Trial Court Programs; Office of the State Public Defender,
Personal Services; Office of the Alternate Defense Counsel, Personal Services; Office of the Child's Representative, Personal Services; Office of the
Respondent Parents' Counsel, Personal Services -- In accordance with Section 13-30-104 (3), C.R.S., funding is provided for judicial compensation, as follows:
FY 2024-25 FY 2025-26
Salary Increase Salary
Chief Justice, Supreme Court $220,614 $5,515 $226,129
Associate Justice, Supreme Court 215,904 5,398 221,302
Chief Judge, Court of Appeals 212,122 5,303 217,425
Associate Judge, Court of Appeals 207,351 5,184 212,535
District Court Judge, Denver Juvenile Court Judge,
and Denver Probate Court Judge 198,798 4,970 203,768
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
County Court Judge 190,245 4,756 195,001
Funding is also provided in the Long Bill to maintain the salary of the State Public Defender at the level of an associate judge of the Court of Appeals and
to maintain the salaries of the Alternate Defense Counsel, the Executive Director of the Office of the Child's Representative, and the Executive Director of
the Office of the Respondent Parents' Counsel at the level of a district court judge.
53a JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT, STATE COURTS ADMINISTRATION, CENTRALLY-ADMINISTERED PROGRAMS, COURTHOUSE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE
-- THE MID-YEAR SUPPLEMENTAL ADJUSTMENT IN THIS LINE ITEM IS CALCULATED TO ADD INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE ASSOCIATED WITH NEW
JUDICIAL OFFICERS. THIS APPROPRIATION REMAINS AVAILABLE FOR EXPENDITURE UNTIL THE CLOSE OF THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR. IT IS THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY'S INTENT THAT COUNTIES ASSUME RESPONSIBILITY FOR COURTHOUSE FURNISHINGS AND OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE ASSOCIATED WITH NEW JUDGES
AND OTHER JUDICIAL STAFF, CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 13-3-108 (1), C.R.S.
54 Judicial Department, Trial Courts, Trial Court Programs -- It is the General Assembly's intent that Joint Budget Committee staff affirmatively and explicitly
highlight and outline the FY 2026-27 annualization adjustments for S.B. 25-024 (Judicial Officers) within FY 2026-27 budget documents and presentations
for Joint Budget Committee awareness and consideration.
54a Judicial Department, Trial Courts, Trial Court Programs -- It is the General Assembly's intent to continue to evaluate the adequacy of the number of district
and county judgeships relative to workload in connection with the FY 2026-27 budget. In particular, it is the General Assembly's intent to prioritize judgeships
initially proposed in S.B. 25-024 but not ultimately approved, including an additional county judgeship in Arapahoe County.
55 Judicial Department, Probation and Related Services, Offender Treatment and Services -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $624,877 of the appropriation
for Offender Treatment and Services be used to provide treatment and services for offenders participating in veterans treatment courts, including peer
mentoring services.
56 Judicial Department, Probation and Related Services, Correctional Treatment Cash Fund Expenditures -- This appropriation includes the following transfers:
$3,600,000 to the Department of Corrections,
$9,000,000 to the Department of Human Services,
$5,600,000 to the Department of Public Safety,
$3,831,000 to the Offender Treatment and Services line item in the Probation Division, and
$169,000 to the District Attorney Adult Pretrial Diversion Programs line in the Centrally Administered Program Section of the Courts Administration Division.
57 Judicial Department, Office of the State Public Defender -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108 (5), C.R.S., up to 5.0 percent
of the total Office of the State Public Defender appropriation may be transferred between line items in the Office of the State Public Defender.
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
58 Judicial Department, Office of the Alternate Defense Counsel -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108 (5), C.R.S., up to 5.0
percent of the total Office of the Alternate Defense Counsel appropriation may be transferred between line items in the Office of the Alternate Defense Counsel.
59 Judicial Department, Office of the Child's Representative -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108 (5), C.R.S., up to 5.0 percent
of the total Office of the Child's Representative's appropriation may be transferred between line items in the Office of the Child's Representative.
60 Judicial Department, Office of the Child's Representative, Operating Expenses -- Of this appropriation, $1,500,000 of the reappropriated funds appropriation
transferred from the Department of Human Services from the Title IV-E Administrative Cost Cash Fund created in Section 26-2-102.5 (3)(b)(I), C.R.S.,
remains available through June 30, 2026.
61 Judicial Department, Office of the Respondent Parents' Counsel -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108 (5), C.R.S., up to 5.0
percent of the total Office of the Respondent Parents' Counsel's appropriation may be transferred between line items in the Office of the Respondent Parents'
Counsel.
62 Judicial Department, Office of Bridges of Colorado -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108 (5), C.R.S., up to 5.0 percent of the
total Office of Bridges of Colorado appropriation may be transferred between line items in the Office of Bridges of Colorado.
63 Judicial Department, Office of Administrative Services for Independent Agencies, ASIA Office -- Of the appropriation in this line item, $52,800 remains
available until the close of the 2026-27 fiscal year.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the judicial department for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 2 of chapter 519,
(HB 24-1430), amend Part IX (6) and the affected totals as Part IX (6) and the affected totals are amended by section 1 of chapter 459, (SB 25-096), and as Part IX (6) and the affected
totals are further amended by section 11 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), Session Laws of Colorado 2025, as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART IX
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
(6) OFFICE OF ALTERNATE DEFENSE COUNSEL65
Personal Services60 4,939,287 4,939,287
(40.7 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 702,630 702,630
Short-term Disability 7,078 7,078
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 19,738 19,738
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 477,729 477,729
Salary Survey 136,635 136,635
Step Pay 153,575 153,575
Operating Expenses 271,959 271,959
1,166,959 1,166,959
Legal Services 36,921 36,921
Capital Outlay 20,010 20,010
Training and Conferences 180,000 100,000 80,000a
Conflict-of-interest Contracts 55,100,564 55,100,564
Mandated Costs 3,049,773 3,049,773
65,095,899
65,990,899
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a This amount shall be from training fees.
TOTALS PART IX
(JUDICIAL) $1,108,122,985 $840,276,168 $197,682,942a $65,738,875 $4,425,000b
$1,109,017,985 $841,171,168
a Of this amount, $45,123,135 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1158

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1158